Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 3. Juvenile Probation

Cross references. —

As to probation generally, see §

7-13-401

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 C.J.S. Infants § 8.

§ 14-6-301.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

14-6-301

through

14-6-314

:

“Department” means the department of family services;

“Home leave” means a form of temporary release for a youth from an institution, which is subject to conditions imposed by the institution or juvenile court of jurisdiction;

“Institution” means the Wyoming boys’ school, Wyoming girls’ school and any other state institution, including a youth correctional facility operated by a private entity in which a Wyoming youth is placed pursuant to W.S.

14-6-201

through

14-6-252

;

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv);

“Probation” means a legal status created by court order following an adjudication of delinquency, a status offense or in need of supervision, where a child is permitted to remain in the child’s home subject to supervision by a city, county or state probation officer, the department of family services or other qualified private organization the court may designate. A child is subject to return to the court for violation of the terms or conditions of probation provided for in the court order;

“Probation officer” means a department of family services employee assigned and trained in the performance of probation supervision services pursuant to department rules and regulations, or a local, county or private agency assigned by a juvenile court to perform probation supervision services;

“Probationer” means an adjudicated youth granted probation by the sentencing juvenile court;

“Intensive supervision program” means a program established under W.S.

14-6-309

which allows participants to live or work in the community under close supervision methods.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 142, § 1; 1998, ch. 7, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 127, § 2, effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “14-6-314” for “14-6-308”; and added (a)(viii).

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, in (a)(iii), substituted “14-6-252” for “14-6-243.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both 2004 acts.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a)(v), inserted “, a status offense” in the first sentence, inserted “provided for in the court order” in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court after expiration of probation term to revoke or modify probation for violations committed during the probation term, 13 ALR4th 1240.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's submission to polygraph or other lie detector testing, 86 ALR4th 709.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's submission to drug testing, 87 ALR4th 929.

Propriety of probation condition exposing defendant to public shame or ridicule, 65 ALR5th 187.

§ 14-6-302.
General powers.

The department of family services shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of W.S.

14-6-301

through

14-6-314

including policy relating to:

The conduct of predisposition reports, social summaries, multidisciplinary team reviews, case plan development, hearings and interviews;

Home leave applications and procedures;

The duties of department probation officers.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 142, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “14-6-314” for “14-6-308,” and in (a)(i) inserted “case plan development” preceding “hearings and interviews.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-6-303.
Home leave eligibility and return to institutions.

In granting a home leave, the institution shall fix terms and conditions it deems proper to govern the conduct of the youth while the home leave is in effect. The terms and conditions may be special in each case or may be prescribed by general rules and regulations of the department of family services in consultation with the institution.

No youth granted a home leave shall be released from an institution until the youth has signed an agreement that the youth will comply with the terms and conditions under which the youth has been released and abide by the laws of the state. The agreement shall be retained in the records of the institution. In addition, no youth shall be granted a home leave until the institution makes a reasonable effort to notify the department of family services’ office nearest the site of the home leave.

A youth on home leave remains in the legal custody and under the control of the department and may be returned to the institution from which the youth was granted home leave for violation of a condition of home leave.

Unless otherwise placed by the department, a home leave violator shall be returned to the institution from which the youth was granted home leave.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 142, § 1.

§ 14-6-304.
Duties of probation officers.

Under direction and supervision of the director of the department or division administrators, the designated department probation officers shall:

Investigate all cases referred by the juvenile court, the department or an institution, and report to the court, department or institution in writing;

Furnish to each person released on probation or home leave under his supervision a written statement of the conditions of the probation or home leave and instruct the youth regarding the conditions;

Supervise the conduct of each youth on probation or home leave through personal visits, reports and other appropriate means, and report in writing as often as required by the juvenile court, department or institution;

Use all practical and suitable methods, not inconsistent with the conditions imposed by the juvenile court, department or institution, to aid and encourage a youth on probation or home leave to bring about improvement in their conditions and conduct;

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 193, § 2.

Under the direction and supervision of the juvenile court, a local, county or private agency assigned probation supervision services may perform all duties designated in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 142, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a)(v), which read: “Transport securely, with court approval, an adjudicated youth to a designated out of home placement.”

Due process not violated by probation terms. —

Due process rights were not violated in a juvenile case because the recommendations of the multi-disciplinary team and the preliminary findings of the juvenile probation officer were included in the trial court's order, which met the statutory purpose of designing individualized dispositions. Moreover, defendant signed off on these conditions, so he had actual knowledge of them.
CT v. State (In re CT), 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 14-6-305.
[Repealed.]

History.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 193, § 2.

§ 14-6-306.
Disclosure of information and data.

All information and data obtained in the discharge of official duties by the supervising probation officer is privileged information and shall not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone other than to the juvenile court, department of family services, department of education, department of health or to others entitled to receive reports as ordered by the court, such as multidisciplinary teams.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 142, § 1.

§ 14-6-307.
Selection of other agencies.

In order to further the objectives of W.S.

14-6-301

through

14-6-308

, the department or the juvenile court may appoint a local, county or private agency which, acting under supervision, may:

Advise and assist the supervising probation officer with special reference to vocational and technical education services for youth on probation or home leave;

Maintain liaison with all appropriate municipal, county, state and federal agencies whose services aid in the reintegration of youth into society;

Assist in programs relating to the social, health and psychological needs of youth under probation supervision or home leave.

Agencies appointed under this section shall not:

Have the power of arrest or the right to execute legal process;

Receive compensation from the state. At the discretion of the probation officer or juvenile court, however, agencies may be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses incurred in performing the duties described in this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 142, § 1.

§ 14-6-308.
Applicability of Interstate Compact on Juveniles.

The provisions of the Interstate Compact on Juveniles for supervision of youth placed on probation, W.S.

14-6-101

[repealed], shall govern in all cases in which a juvenile court of this state grants a probationer permission to leave this state to reside in any other state signatory to the compact. Permission shall not be granted to the probationer to reside in another signatory state without the consent of that signatory state.

Upon the request of the juvenile court granting probation, the state compact administrator shall apply to the proper authorities of the signatory state for its consent to sending the probationer there.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 142, § 1.

§ 14-6-309.
Authority to establish an intensive supervision program; rulemaking authority.

The department is authorized to adopt reasonable rules and regulations to establish an intensive supervision program for juvenile probationers.

An intensive supervision program established under this article may require:

Electronic monitoring, regimented daily schedules or itineraries, house arrest, telephone contact, drug testing, curfew checks or other supervision methods which facilitate contact with supervisory personnel;

Community service work, family, educational or vocational counseling, treatment for substance abuse, mental health treatment and monitoring of restitution orders and fines previously imposed on the participant; and

Imposition of supervision fees to be paid by participants.

Subject to legislative appropriation the department may, by negotiation without competitive bid or by competitive bidding, contract with any governmental or nongovernmental entity to provide services required to carry out the provisions of this article.

The department shall have general supervisory authority over all juvenile probationers participating in an intensive supervision program under this article.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 14-6-310.
Program participation not a matter of right.

Participation in an intensive supervision program authorized by this article is a matter of discretion and not of right.

No juvenile probationer shall be allowed to participate in an intensive supervision program authorized by this article unless the probationer signs an intensive supervised probation agreement to abide by the terms of all the rules and regulations of the department relating to the operation of the program and agrees to submit to administrative sanctions which may be imposed under W.S.

14-6-314

.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 14-6-311.
Program participation as a condition of release from placement.

The department may, as a condition of release from court-ordered placement and if authorized by the court, require a juvenile probationer to participate in an intensive supervision program established under this article, provided:

Space and funding are available for the probationer’s participation in the program;

The department determines the probationer has a reasonable likelihood of successfully participating in the program.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 14-6-312.
Placement of probationer in program by juvenile court.

A juvenile court may, as a condition of probation, order that a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent participate in an intensive supervision program established under this article, provided:

Space is available in the program;

The juvenile probationer agrees to participate in the program;

The department determines the probationer has a reasonable likelihood of successfully participating in the program; and

The legislature has specifically appropriated funds or other grants and aid payments authorized for this program are available to pay for the probationer’s participation in the program.

The department shall be responsible for including in the predispositional study to the juvenile court any recommendations for the utilization of an intensive supervision program created under this article.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 14-6-313.
Program participation as an alternative to probation revocation.

The department may, as an alternative to recommending revocation of probation, offer any juvenile probationer who is not already participating in an intensive supervision program the opportunity to participate in a program authorized under this article, provided:

Space and funding are available for the probationer’s participation in the program;

The department determines the probationer has a reasonable likelihood of successfully participating in the program;

The probationer agrees to participate in the program; and

The department shall notify the juvenile court and the prosecuting attorney of the probationer’s agreement to participate in an intensive supervision program and provide a copy of the signed agreement to the juvenile court and the prosecuting attorney.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 14-6-314.
Administrative sanctions for program violations.

The department is authorized to establish by rule and regulation a system of administrative sanctions as an alternative to probation revocation for juvenile probationers who violate the rules and restrictions of an intensive supervision program established under this article.

Authorized sanctions may include:

Loss or restriction of privileges; and

Community service.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.